test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosj_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховыдоʼ  
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: ховэдамзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: ховэнась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [ховысь, ховэсь]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: ховэнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: ховэдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: ховэхэнзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: ховэваць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: ховэдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [ховыць, ховэць]  
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховэвась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховэрась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховэдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховэминзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховэринзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховэдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховэваць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховэраць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховэдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховэхэюнась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховэхэюдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховэхэюдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховэхэюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховэхэюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховэхэюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховэхэюнаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховэхэюдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховэхэюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховынась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховыдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховыдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховынинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховыдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховыдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховынаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховыдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховыдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хонакэв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хонакэр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хонакэда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хонакэмиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хонакэриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хонакэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хонакэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хонакэраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хонакэдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хонакын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хонакыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хонакыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хонакыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хонакыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хонакыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хонакынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хонакыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хонакыдоʼ     
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хонакэвась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хонакэрась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хонакэдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хонакэминзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хонакэринзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хонакэдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хонакэваць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хонакэраць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хонакэдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюнась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хонакэхэюнаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хонакэхэюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хонакынась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хонакыдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хонакыдась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хонакынинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хонакыдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хонакыдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хонакынаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хонакыдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хонакыдонзь     
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховэкэв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховэкэр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховэкэда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховэкэмиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховэкэриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховэкэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховэкэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховэкэраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховэкэдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховэкэхэюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховэкын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховэкыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховэкыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховэкыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховэкыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховэкыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховэкынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховэкыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховэкыдоʼ      
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcSg3: хобцакэв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcSg3: хобцакэр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcSg3: хобцакэда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcSg3: хобцакэмиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcSg3: хобцакэриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcSg3: хобцакэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcSg3: хобцакэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcSg3: хобцакэраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcSg3: хобцакэдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcDu3: хобцакэхэюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcPl3: хобцакын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcPl3: хобцакыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcPl3: хобцакыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcPl3: хобцакыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcPl3: хобцакыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcPl3: хобцакыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcPl3: хобцакынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcPl3: хобцакыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcPl3: хобцакыдоʼ      
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хонарахав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хонарахар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хонарахада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хонарахамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хонарахариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хонарахадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хонарахаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хонарахараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хонарахадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хонарахахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хонарахахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хонарахахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хонарахахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хонарахахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хонарахахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хонарахахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хонарахахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хонарахахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хонарыхын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хонарыхыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хонарыхыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хонарыхыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хонарыхыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хонарыхыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хонарыхынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хонарыхыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хонарыхыдоʼ 
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховэрахав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховэрахар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховэрахада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховэрахамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховэрахариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховэрахадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховэрахаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховэрахараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховэрахадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховэрахахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховэрыхын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховэрыхыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховэрыхыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховэрыхыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховэрыхыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховэрыхыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховэрыхынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховэрыхыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховэрыхыдоʼ  
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховандархав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховандархар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховандархада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховандархамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховандархариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховандархадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховандархаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховандархараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховандархадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховандархахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховандархахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховандархахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховандархахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховандархахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховандархахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховандархахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховандархахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховандархахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховандархын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховандархыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховандархыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховандархыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховандархыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховандархыдиʼ
